Illinois, session 104th, SB3360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-4.60 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.60 new)7    Sec. 12-4.60. SNAP overpayment; agency error. 8    (a) As used in the Section, "SNAP" means the federal 9Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. 10    (b) Notwithstanding any other law and subject to federal 11approval, if required, the Department of Human Services shall 12not collect or initiate any debt collection action to recoup 13any overpayment in SNAP benefits that was made to a SNAP 14recipient as a result of agency error. The Department shall 15apply for any federal waivers or approvals necessary to 16implement this Section.